Washington statutes.
RCW 1.12.050

Number and gender.

Words importing the singular number may also be applied to the plural of persons and things; words importing the plural may be applied to the singular; and words importing the masculine gender may be extended to females also.

[1891 c 23 s 1, part; Code 1881 ss 756, 965, 1920; 1877 p 153 s 761; 1857 p 45 s 1; 1854 p 99 s 135 and p 221 s 502; RRS s 148.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section is a part of 1891 c 23 s 1. The introductory phrase of that section provides: "The following provisions relative to the construction of statutes shall be rules of construction and shall constitute a part of the code of procedure of this state:".

Probate, number and gender: RCW 11.02.005.

Statutes in gender-neutral terms: RCW 44.04.210.

Wrongful death, number and gender: RCW 4.20.005.